Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.115

Revenue bonds.

A metropolitan park district may issue and sell revenue bonds as provided in chapter 39.46 RCW to be made payable from the operating revenues of the metropolitan park district.

[ 1989 c 319 s 1.]